Wisconsin, session 2025, AB550.
do enact as follows:AB550,11Section 1. 97.26 of the statutes is created to read:AB550,2,6297.26 (1) Food product ingredient disclosure requirements. (a) A 3person that manufactures a packaged food product for distribution or sale in this 4state shall label each packaged food product intended for human consumption that 5it manufactures with a warning label that discloses the use or existence of any of 6the following ingredients in the food product:AB550,2,771. Acesulfame potassium.AB550,2,882. Acetic acid ester, or acetylated esters of mono and diglycerides.AB550,2,993. Activated charcoal.AB550,2,10104. Anisole.AB550,2,11115. Atrazine.AB550,2,12126. Azodicarbonamide.AB550,2,13137. Butylated hydroxyanisole.AB550,2,14148. Butylated hydroxytoluene.AB550,2,15159. Bleached flour.AB550,2,161610. Bromated flour.AB550,2,171711. Calcium bromate.AB550,2,181812. Canthaxanthin.AB550,2,191913. Carrageenan.AB550,2,202014. Diacetyl.AB550,2,212115. Diacetyl tartaric and fatty acid esters of mono- and diglycerides.AB550,2,222216. Dimethylamylamine. AB550,3,1117. Dioctyl sodium sulfosuccinate.AB550,3,2218. Ficin.AB550,3,3319. Interesterified palm oil.AB550,3,4420. Interesterified soybean oil.AB550,3,5521. Lactylated fatty acid esters of glycerol and propylene glycol.AB550,3,6622. Lye.AB550,3,7723. Melatonin.AB550,3,8824. Morpholine.AB550,3,9925. Olestra.AB550,3,101026. Partially hydrogenated oil.AB550,3,111127. Potassium aluminum sulfate.AB550,3,121228. Potassium bromate.AB550,3,131329. Potassium iodate.AB550,3,141430. Potassium sorbate.AB550,3,151531. Propylene oxide.AB550,3,161632. Propylparaben.AB550,3,171733. Sodium aluminum sulfate.AB550,3,181834. Sodium lauryl sulfate.AB550,3,191935. Sodium stearyl fumarate.AB550,3,202036. Stearyl tartrate.AB550,3,212137. Synthetic or artificial vanillin.AB550,3,222238. Synthetic trans fatty acid, or artificial trans fat.AB550,3,232339. Thiodipropionic acid.AB550,3,242440. Titanium dioxide.AB550,4,1141. Toluene. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab550 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab550 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB550 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB550 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB550: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting